nl: Zachtheidsniveau: Low-profile; Zacht; Standaard; Anders
nb: Mykhetsnivå: Lavprofil; Myk; Standard; Annet
en: Softness level: Low-profile; Soft; Standard; Other
sk-SK: Úroveň mäkkosti: Nízkoprofilová; Mäkká; Štandardná; Iná
zh-TW: 柔軟度等級: 低厚度; 柔軟; 標準; 其他
pt-BR: Maciez nível: Discreto; Macio; Padrão; Outro
it: Livello di morbidezza: A basso profilo; Morbido; Standard; Altro
ja: 柔らかさレベル: ロープロファイル; ソフト; スタンダード; その他
el: Επίπεδο απαλότητας: Χαμηλού προφίλ; Μαλακό; Τυπικό; Άλλο
de: Weichheitsgrad: Low-Profile; Weich; Standard; Andere
sv: Mjukhetsnivå: Lågprofil; Mjuk; Standard; Övrigt
ru: Уровень мягкости: Низкопрофильный; Мягкий; Стандартный; Другое
lt-LT: Minkštumo lygis: Žemo profilio; Minkštas; Standartinis; Kita
ko: 부드러움 수준: 로우 프로파일; 소프트; 표준; 기타
pl: Poziom miękkości: Niskoprofilowy; Miękki; Standardowy; Inny
vi: Mức độ mềm mại: Độ dày thấp; Mềm; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
pt-PT: Nível de suavidade: Perfil baixo; Macio; Padrão; Outro
fr: Niveau de souplesse: Profil bas; Moelleux; Standard; Autre
bg-BG: Ниво на мекота: Нисък профил; Меко; Стандартно; Друго
fi: Pehmeystaso: Matala profiili; Pehmeä; Vakio; Muu
tr: Yumuşaklık seviyesi: Düşük profilli; Yumuşak; Standart; Diğer
hr-HR: Razina mekoće: Niski profil; Meko; Standardno; Ostalo
ro-RO: Nivel de moliciune: Profil redus; Moale; Standard; Altele
th: ระดับความนุ่ม: บาง; นุ่ม; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 柔软度等级: 矮版; 柔软; 标准; 其他
hu: Lágysági szint: Alacsony profilú; Puha; Standard; Egyéb
da: Blødhedsniveau: Lav profil; Blød; Standard; Andet
es: Nivel de suavidad: Perfil bajo; Suave; Estándar; Otro
sl-SI: Stopnja mehkobe: Nizek profil; Mehko; Standardno; Drugo
cs: Úroveň měkkosti: Nízký profil; Měkké; Standardní; Jiné